Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3452.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 40 of chapter 268 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “robbery,” in line 2, the
following words:- , or has sustained serious bodily injury as a result of the act of another person
or the omission of another person under a duty to act,.
SECTION 2. Said section 40 of said chapter 268, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word "crime," in line 3, the following words:- or injury.
SECTION 3. Said section 40 of said chapter 268, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word "official," in line 5, the following words:- , which may
include, but not be limited to, dialing the emergency telephone access number 911, or its local
equivalent,.
SECTION 4. Said section 40 of said chapter 268, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
of 2

For the purposes of this section ''serious bodily injury'' shall mean bodily injury which
creates a substantial and imminent risk of death, permanent disfigurement or loss or impairment
of a bodily function, limb or organ.
of 2